Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 5
MOTIONS ALLEGING
AN UNCONSTITUTIONAL LAW

16-9-501. Notice to the attorney general when a defendant alleges a law is unconstitutional.

If a defendant in a criminal proceeding files a motion or other pleading that includes a claim alleging a state statute or municipal ordinance is unconstitutional, the defendant shall serve the attorney general with a copy of the motion or pleading. The attorney general shall be entitled to be heard on the matter. Failure to comply with this section shall not constitute a waiver of a defendant's constitutional rights or a defendant's right to raise a constitutional challenge.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 35, § 1, effective March 13.